Utah, session 2026, HB526.
Section 1. Section 53G-6-214 is enacted to read:53G-6-214. Student welfare check referrals -- Unknown whereabouts.(1)An LEA shall make a referral for a student welfare check if a student has been absent for 10 or more consecutive school days and all of the following conditions are met:(a)the student's parent has failed to notify the school of the student's absence;(b)the student's parent has not filed a home school affidavit under Section 53G-6-204;(c)the student's parent has not provided notice of unenrollment to the LEA;(d)the student's parent has failed to respond to repeated communications from the school, including communications through email, telephone, text message, postal mail, or other reasonable methods; and(e)one of the following is true:(i)the LEA has not received a request for student records from another educational entity; or(ii)there is no record of the student being enrolled in another LEA.(2)An LEA shall make a referral described in Subsection (1) to:(a)local law enforcement; or(b)the Division of Child and Family Services.(3)A referral under this section is for the purpose of conducting a welfare check to verify the student's safety and well-being.(4)This section does not preclude or obligate any other action under this part or Title 80, Chapter 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.